test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_US_STEM_2.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_US_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_US_STEM_2

     kus+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kuja
     kus+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kujang
     kus+V+DIRECT+PAST: kujan
     kus+V+NON_FACTIVE: kujang
     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujang
     kus+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujanggang
     kus+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kujangang
     kus+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kujiinii
     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kujaangaa
     kus+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kujaangaan
     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kujang ñasa'áa
     kus+V+NEAR+FUTURE: kujang ñasa'áang
     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kujang ñasaasdláa
     kus+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kujang ñasaasdláang
     kus+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kuj'ahlanggang
     kus+V+CERTAIN+PAST: kuj'ahlanggan
     kus+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kuj'ahlanggiinii
     kus+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kuj'ahlans
     kus+V+REFLEXIVE: kuj'ahl
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujang'waa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujang'waang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kujang'waa.ang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujang'anggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kujang'angang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kujang ñasaa'áng
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kujang ñasaa'ánggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kujang ñasaasdlä'áng
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kujang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujang'ang'waa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kujang'ang'waang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: kujang'ang'waa.ang
